Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3586.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [142F.16] REGIONAL FOOD BANK GRANTS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Establishment. new text end new text begin The commissioner of children, youth, and families must establish regional food bank grants to increase the availability of food to individuals and families in need. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Distribution of appropriation. new text end new text begin The commissioner must distribute money appropriated for grants under this section to regional food banks and Minnesota Tribal governments, as defined in section 10.65, using a formula based on the number of persons in households having incomes below the federal poverty level and the number of unemployed persons in the service area of the food bank or Minnesota Tribal government. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Allowable use of money. new text end new text begin (a) Grant money distributed under this section must be used to purchase, transport, and coordinate the distribution of food to sites approved by the commissioner. Grant money distributed under this section may also be used to purchase personal hygiene products, including but not limited to diapers and toilet paper. new text end new text begin (b) Food and other allowable products purchased with grant money under this section must be available at no cost at sites approved by the commissioner. new text end new text begin (c) Grant money distributed under this section must not be used for the compensation of officers, directors, trustees, key employees, and highest compensated employees as reported on Internal Revenue Service Form 990. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Reporting. new text end new text begin (a) Food banks and Minnesota Tribal governments receiving grant money under this section must retain records documenting expenditures of the grant money and comply with any additional documentation requirements imposed by the commissioner. new text end new text begin (b) Food and other allowable products purchased with grant money under this section must be available at no cost to sites approved by the commissioner. new text end new text begin (c) Food banks and Minnesota Tribal governments must report on the use of grant money received under this section to the commissioner. The commissioner must determine the timing and form required for the reports. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Ineligible expenditures. new text end new text begin If the commissioner determines that ineligible expenditures were made by a food bank or Minnesota Tribal government under this section, the ineligible amount must be repaid by the food bank or Tribal government to the commissioner and deposited in the general fund. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION; REGIONAL FOOD BANK GRANTS.new text end new text begin $10,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of children, youth, and families for regional food bank grants under Minnesota Statutes, section 142F.16. The base for this appropriation is $10,000,000 in fiscal year 2028 and $10,000,000 in fiscal year 2029. new text end